District of Columbia statutes.
8-105.11

Injunction.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this subchapter, WASA may seek appropriate civil action to secure a temporary restraining order, a preliminary or permanent injunction, or declaratory or other appropriate relief to restrain, minimize, halt, or eliminate the violation of, or attempted violation of, any provision of this subchapter or its implementing rules.

History

Mar. 12, 1986, D.C. Law 6-95, § 12, 33 DCR 577
Oct. 26, 2010, D.C. Law 18-256, § 2(i), 57 DCR 8082

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 6-961.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 18-256 substituted “WASA may seek” for “the Mayor may authorize”.